Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 8 Reopening Estates

§ 2-8-101.
After-discovered property or correction of property description.

The final settlement of an estate shall not prevent the reopening thereof for the purpose of administering after-discovered property or for the correction of the description of the property administered, and final settlement shall not prevent the subsequent issue of letters if it becomes necessary for any cause that letters be issued again.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 70, art. 18, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 4834; C.S. 1910, § 5703; C.S. 1920, § 6978; Laws 1927, ch. 21, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 88-3605; C.S. 1945, § 6-2310; W.S. 1957, § 2-307; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-411; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Applied

in

In re Estate of Baker, 484 P.2d 1175,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

In re Estate of Baker, 483 P.2d 513,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1971); Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).

§ 2-8-102.
Contents of petition; notice of hearing.

Any heir at law, devisee or creditor whose claim was allowed but not satisfied in the original administration or other person interested may petition for the reopening of the estate upon the grounds specified in W.S.

2-8-101

. The petition shall set forth the names of all heirs at law, devisees and creditors and their address, if known. If the address is unknown to the petitioner he shall so state in the petition. Upon filing of the petition, the clerk shall appoint a day for hearing the petition and give notice thereof by mailing by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the notice to the heirs at law, devisees and creditors named in the petition. Where an address is unknown notice shall be served as provided in the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 21, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 88-3606; C.S. 1945, § 6-2311; W.S. 1957, § 2-308; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-412; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2018 ch. 91, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the fourth sentence substituted “certified
mail, return receipt requested” for “registered letter”
following “mailing by”.

Cross references. —

As to service of process under the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Cited

in

In re Estate of Baker, 483 P.2d 513,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1971); Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).

Law reviews. —

See “The Curative Act and the Probate Code,” 3 Wyo. L.J. 204.

§ 2-8-103.
Proceedings upon hearing; supplemental orders or decrees.

Upon hearing the petition, if due cause is shown, the court may reopen the estate and administer any after-discovered property and make any necessary orders correcting descriptions as to the estate administered therein. No proceedings shall be taken by the court after the reopening of an estate except as necessary to administer after-discovered property or to correct errors made in the description of the estate previously administered. Any orders or decrees of the court made necessary by the reopening of the estate shall be designated as supplemental orders or decrees.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 21, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 88-3607; C.S. 1945, § 6-2312; W.S. 1957, § 2-309; W.S. 1977, § 2-6-413; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 2; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Baker, 483 P.2d 513,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

Strngari v. Taylor (In re Estate of Novakovich), 2004 WY 158, 101 P.3d 931,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(2004).